Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; State Route 89; matching monies The sum of $36,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the town of Chino Valley to develop the design concept report for the State Route 89 widening project between Road 5 North and Road 3 North. The department of transportation may distribute the monies appropriated in this section only if the town of Chino Valley demonstrates to the department that the town has a commitment for at least $1,000,000 in matching monies of gifts, grants and donations from sources other than this state.